Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.630

Return of inactive voter to active status—Cancellation of registration.

(1) The county auditor shall return an inactive voter to active voter status if, prior to the passage of two federal general elections, the voter:

(a) Notifies the auditor of a change of address;

(b) Responds to a confirmation notice with information that he or she continues to reside at the registration address; or

(c) Votes or attempts to vote in a primary, special election, or general election.

(2) If the inactive voter fails to provide a notice or take an action as described in subsection (1) of this section, the auditor shall cancel the person's voter registration.

(3) The county auditor must cancel an inactive voter registration when receiving information indicating that the inactive voter has moved out of state or died.

[ 2023 c 466 s 25; 2009 c 369 s 31; 2004 c 267 s 131; 2003 c 111 s 241. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 39. Formerly RCW 29.10.075.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.